Nevada, session 83, SB400-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.205 1. A reinvestment advisory committee shall:
(a) Solicit and review reports from the Division and Medicaid
managed care organizations concerning the reinvestment of funds
by those Medicaid managed care organizations in the communities
served by the Medicaid managed care organizations.
(b) Report to the Division and Medicaid managed care
organizations concerning initiatives of local governments in the
county to address homelessness [,] and to provide sustainable
medication and prescription drug services, alcohol or drug
intervention or rehabilitation services, and emergency and
supportive housing . [issues and social determinants of health.]
-
*SB400_R3*

– 3 –
(c) Make recommendations based on the reports reviewed
pursuant to paragraph (a) to the Division and Medicaid managed
care organizations concerning the reinvestment of funds by those
Medicaid managed care organizations in the communities served by
the Medicaid managed care organizations. Those recommendations
must include, without limitation, recommendations for the use of
such funds for the purposes of:
(1) Developing innovative partnerships with community
development organizations and providers of housing services; and
(2) Supporting the initiatives of local governments in the
county to address homelessness [,] and to provide sustainable
medication and prescription drug services, alcohol or drug
intervention or rehabilitation services, and emergency and
supportive housing . [issues and social determinants of health.]
2. On or before December 31 of each year, a reinvestment
advisory committee shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning:
(1) The uses of funds reinvested by Medicaid managed care
organizations in the communities served by those Medicaid
managed care organizations, including, without limitation, efforts to
address homelessness [, disparities in health care and social
determinants of health;] and to provide sustainable medication and
prescription drug services, alcohol or drug intervention or
rehabilitation services, and emergency and supportive housing;
and
(2) The activities of the reinvestment advisory committee
during the calendar year, including, without limitation, the
recommendations made by the reinvestment advisory committee
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
(b) Submit the report to:
(1) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(II) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature.
(2) The Director of the Department.
3. As used in this section, “Medicaid managed care
organization” means a managed care organization that provides
health care services to recipients of Medicaid who reside in the
county for which a reinvestment advisory committee is established.
Sec. 2. NRS 422.273 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.273 1. For any Medicaid managed care program
established in the State of Nevada, the Department shall contract
only with a health maintenance organization that has:
-
*SB400_R3*

– 4 –
(a) Negotiated in good faith with a federally-qualified health
center to provide health care services for the health maintenance
organization;
(b) Negotiated in good faith with the University Medical Center
of Southern Nevada to provide inpatient and ambulatory services to
recipients of Medicaid; and
(c) Negotiated in good faith with the University of Nevada
School of Medicine to provide health care services to recipients of
Medicaid.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting a
federally-qualified health center, the University Medical Center of
Southern Nevada or the University of Nevada School of Medicine
from the requirements for contracting with the health maintenance
organization.
2. During the development and implementation of any
Medicaid managed care program, the Department shall cooperate
with the University of Nevada School of Medicine by assisting in
the provision of an adequate and diverse group of patients upon
which the school may base its educational programs.
3. The University of Nevada School of Medicine may establish
a nonprofit organization to assist in any research necessary for the
development of a Medicaid managed care program, receive and
accept gifts, grants and donations to support such a program and
assist in establishing educational services about the program for
recipients of Medicaid.
4. For the purpose of contracting with a Medicaid managed
care program pursuant to this section, a health maintenance
organization is exempt from the provisions of NRS 695C.123.
5. The provisions of this section apply to any managed care
organization, including a health maintenance organization, that
provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division. Such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization is not required to
establish a system for conducting external reviews of adverse
determinations in accordance with chapter 695B, 695C or 695G of
NRS. This subsection does not exempt such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
6. Each contract entered into by the Department with a
health maintenance organization to provide health care services to
recipients of Medicaid in all geographic areas of this State shall
include a requirement for the health maintenance organization to
reinvest a percentage of the annual profits of the health
maintenance organization in programs and initiatives to address
-
*SB400_R3*

– 5 –
homelessness and to provide sustainable medication and
prescription drug services, alcohol or drug intervention or
rehabilitation services, and emergency and supportive housing in
the local communities in which the health maintenance
organization operates.
7. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Federally-qualified health center” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B).
(b) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695C.030.
(c) “Managed care organization” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.050.
Sec. 3. NRS 422.273 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.273 1. To the extent that money is available, the
Department shall:
(a) Establish a Medicaid managed care program to provide
health care services to recipients of Medicaid in all geographic areas
of this State. The program is not required to provide services to
recipients of Medicaid who are aged, blind or disabled pursuant to
Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1381 et seq.
(b) Conduct a statewide procurement process to select health
maintenance organizations to provide the services described in
paragraph (a).
2. For any Medicaid managed care program established in the
State of Nevada, the Department shall contract only with a health
maintenance organization that has:
(a) Negotiated in good faith with a federally-qualified health
center to provide health care services for the health maintenance
organization;
(b) Negotiated in good faith with the University Medical Center
of Southern Nevada to provide inpatient and ambulatory services to
recipients of Medicaid;
(c) Negotiated in good faith with the University of Nevada
School of Medicine to provide health care services to recipients of
Medicaid; and
(d) Complied with the provisions of subsection 2 of
NRS 695K.220.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting a
federally-qualified health center, the University Medical Center of
Southern Nevada or the University of Nevada School of Medicine
from the requirements for contracting with the health maintenance
organization.
3. During the development and implementation of any
Medicaid managed care program, the Department shall cooperate
-
*SB400_R3*

– 6 –
with the University of Nevada School of Medicine by assisting in
the provision of an adequate and diverse group of patients upon
which the school may base its educational programs.
4. The University of Nevada School of Medicine may establish
a nonprofit organization to assist in any research necessary for the
development of a Medicaid managed care program, receive and
accept gifts, grants and donations to support such a program and
assist in establishing educational services about the program for
recipients of Medicaid.
5. For the purpose of contracting with a Medicaid managed
care program pursuant to this section, a health maintenance
organization is exempt from the provisions of NRS 695C.123.
6. To the extent that money is available, a Medicaid managed
care program must include, without limitation, a state-directed
payment arrangement established in accordance with 42 C.F.R. §
438.6(c) to require a Medicaid managed care organization to
reimburse a critical access hospital and any federally-qualified
health center or rural health clinic affiliated with a critical access
hospital for covered services at a rate that is equal to or greater than
the rate received by the critical access hospital, federally-qualified
health center or rural health clinic, as applicable, for services
provided to recipients of Medicaid on a fee-for-service basis.
7. The provisions of this section apply to any managed care
organization, including a health maintenance organization, that
provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division. Such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization is not required to
establish a system for conducting external reviews of adverse
determinations in accordance with chapter 695B, 695C or 695G of
NRS. This subsection does not exempt such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
8. Each contract entered into by the Department with a
health maintenance organization to provide the services described
in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 shall include a requirement for
the health maintenance organization to reinvest a percentage of
the annual profits of the health maintenance organization in
programs and initiatives to address homelessness and to provide
sustainable medication and prescription drug services, alcohol or
drug intervention or rehabilitation services, and emergency and
supportive housing in the local communities in which the health
maintenance organization operates.
9. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
-
*SB400_R3*

– 7 –
(a) “Critical access hospital” means a hospital which has been
certified as a critical access hospital by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e).
(b) “Federally-qualified health center” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B).
(c) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695C.030.
(d) “Managed care organization” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.050.
(e) “Rural health clinic” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42
C.F.R. § 405.2401.
Sec. 3.3. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall establish the Fiscal Advisory
Committee for a Flexible Continuum of Care Plan which consists
of the following members appointed by the Director of the
Department:
(a) A representative from the largest incorporated city in the
service area of each Continuum of Care in this State, who must
also reside in the service area of the Continuum of Care in which
the city he or she represents is located;
(b) A person who represents a county in this State;
(c) A person who represents law enforcement;
(d) A person selected from a list of nominees provided by the
Nevada Resort Association; and
(e) A representative of a nonprofit organization that provides
services to persons who are homeless.
2. To the extent practicable, each member appointed
pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (e) of subsection 1 must be
selected from a list of nominees provided by a Continuum of Care
in this State. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 1, each Continuum of Care in this State shall submit a
list of nominees to fill any vacancy on the Advisory Committee.
Each member appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
must be selected from a list of nominees provided by the
Continuum of Care whose service area includes the city which the
member represents.
3. Each member of the Advisory Committee serves a term of 2
years. Members may be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years
in the same manner as the original appointments. Any vacancy
occurring in the membership of the Advisory Committee must be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
4. The members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation but are entitled to receive the per diem allowance
-
*SB400_R3*

– 8 –
and travel expenses provided for state officers and employees
generally.
5. A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a
majority of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for any
official action taken by the Advisory Committee.
6. A member of the Advisory Committee who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must
be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
compensation to prepare for and attend meetings of the Advisory
Committee and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties
of the Advisory Committee in the most timely manner practicable.
A state agency or political subdivision of this State shall not
require an officer or employee who is a member of the Advisory
Committee to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry
out his or her duties as a member of the Advisory Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
7. At its first meeting and annually thereafter, the Advisory
Committee shall elect a Chair from among its members.
8. To the extent that funding is available for that purpose,
and upon application by the Advisory Committee in such form as
the Department may require, the Department may make grants to
the Advisory Committee to fund:
(a) Services for persons released from prison or a county, city
or town jail or detention facility including, without limitation,
sustainable medication and prescription drug services, alcohol or
drug intervention or rehabilitation services, and emergency and
supportive housing.
(b) Services for persons leaving emergency shelters, including,
without limitation, sustainable medication and prescription drug
services, alcohol or drug intervention or rehabilitation services,
and emergency and supportive housing.
(c) Services for persons leaving acute care settings, mental
health care facilities, drug and alcohol rehabilitation facilities, or
transitional housing.
(d) Emergency and supportive housing services, including,
without limitation, the acquisition and rehabilitation of properties
suitable for conversion to supportive housing.
9. Each fiscal year, a city in this State whose population is
150,000 or more but less than 500,000 shall transmit to the
Department an amount of money which is not less than
$1,000,000 but not more than $2,000,000 from money available
for that purpose for allocation to the Advisory Committee to fund
-
*SB400_R3*

– 9 –
programs to address homelessness in the service area of the
Continuum of Care in which the city is located.
10. The Department shall assist the Advisory Committee to
enter into an agreement with a federally-qualified health center to
provide services described in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of
subsection 8.
11. On or before September 30 of each year, the Advisory
Committee shall submit to the governing board of the Continuum
of Care, the Department and the Interim Finance Committee a
report detailing the use of any grant of money received from the
Department pursuant to subsection 8 and the status of any
programs or services funded using such money.
12. Any grant of money made to the Advisory Committee and
any funding allocated by the Advisory Committee to any person
must not supplant, replace, offset or otherwise reduce funding for
programs to address homelessness.
13. As used in this section, “Continuum of Care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in 24 C.F.R. § 578.3.
Sec. 3.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7.1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of
$17,000,000:
1. For allocation to Fiscal Advisory Committee for a Flexible
Continuum of Care Plan established pursuant to section 3.3 of this
act to fund the services described in subsection 8 of section 3.3 of
this act; or
2. To satisfy matching requirements for federal grants to fund
the services described in subsection 8 of section 3.3 of this act.
Sec. 7.3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of
$1,000,000 for allocation to the Fiscal Advisory Committee for a
Flexible Continuum of Care Plan established pursuant to section 3.3
of this act to match an equal amount of money provided by local
governments in the service area of the Northern Nevada Continuum
of Care to fund the services described in subsection 8 of section 3.3
of this act in the service area of the Northern Nevada Continuum of
Care.
Sec. 7.5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of
$1,000,000 for allocation to the Fiscal Advisory Committee for a
Flexible Continuum of Care Plan established pursuant to section 3.3
-
*SB400_R3*

– 10 –
of this act to match an equal amount of money provided by local
governments in the service area of the Rural Nevada Continuum of
Care to fund the services described in subsection 8 of section 3.3 of
this act in the service area of the Rural Nevada Continuum of Care.
Sec. 7.7. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made
by sections 7.1, 7.3 and 7.5 of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2025, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 19, 2025, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 7.9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services for
allocation to the Fiscal Advisory Committee for a Flexible
Continuum of Care Plan established pursuant to section 3.3 of this
act to address homelessness in the city of Las Vegas the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................... $9,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................... $1,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 8. The amendatory provisions of sections 1, 2 and 3 of
this act do not apply during the current term of any agreement
entered into between the Department of Health and Human Services
and a health maintenance organization pursuant to NRS 422.273
before January 1, 2024, but do apply to any extension or renewal of
such an agreement and to any agreement entered into between the
Department of Health and Human Services and a health
maintenance organization pursuant to NRS 422.273 on or after
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB400_R3*

– 11 –
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 3.3, 3.7 and 7.1 to 7.9, inclusive, of this act become
effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 1, 2 and 8 of this act become effective on
January 1, 2024.
4. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
5. Sections 4 to 7, inclusive, and 9 of this act become effective
on July 1, 2027.
6. The amendatory provisions of section 2 of this act expire by
limitation on December 31, 2025.
H
-
*SB400_R3*